skt_gen/Sentence/UNKN_PDGM/unknwn_sup.dix
<pardef n="/qw__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qw</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qwI</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qnwi</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qw</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qwI</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qnwi</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qwA</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByAm</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xBiH</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qwe</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByAm</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByaH</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qwaH</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByAm</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByaH</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qwaH</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qwoH</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qwAm</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qwi</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qwoH</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>tsu</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qw</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qwI</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qnwi</l><r>qw<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>




<pardef n="/w__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>w</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wI</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>nwi</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>w</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wI</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>nwi</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wA</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByAm</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xBiH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>we</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByAm</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByaH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>waH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByAm</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByaH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>waH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>woH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wAm</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wi</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>woH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>tsu</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>w</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wI</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>nwi</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/qw__nm"/></e>
